Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.025

Delivery and filing of statements.

(1) A statement may be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW. A certified copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another state may be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW. Either filing has the effect provided in this chapter with respect to partnership property located in or transactions that occur in this state.

(2) A statement delivered by a partnership to the secretary of state for filing must be executed by at least two partners. Other statements must be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter. An individual who executes a statement as, or on behalf of, a partner or other person shall personally declare under penalty of perjury that the contents of the statement are accurate.

(3) A person authorized by this chapter to deliver a statement to the secretary of state for filing may amend or cancel the statement by delivering to the secretary of state for filing an amendment or cancellation that names the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation.

(4) A person who delivers a statement to the secretary of state for filing shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5102; 1998 c 103 s 105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.